Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 1. Construction of Public Works.

Sec. 35.15.010.
Construction by department.

Except as provided in AS

44.33.300

, it is the general policy of the state to require the construction of all public works under bid contract in accordance with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). However, when the estimated cost of a construction project is less than $100,000, or when it appears to be in the best interests of the state, the department may perform the work, notwithstanding any other provisions of law. A complete record shall be kept by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee of all transactions entered into under this section, including names of employees involved in the transactions.

Construction or professional services in connection with the construction of a public work performed by the department under (a) of this section which have an estimated cost exceeding $5,000 may not be performed by the department unless the commissioner determines, in writing, that the cost to the state will be less than that incurred as a result of a formally advertised or negotiated contract. The determination of the commissioner shall be supported by findings of fact which shall set out enough facts and circumstances to clearly justify the determination. The determination and findings shall be maintained as a permanent record of the department.

In this section, “professional services” means architectural, engineering, or land surveying services.

History.

(§ 1 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 277 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 104 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 144 SLA 1982; am § 34 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, § 8 et seq.

73A C.J.S., Public Contracts, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 35.15.020.
Request for public bids.

The solicitation of bids for construction of public works is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).
The request for bids may require the contractor to furnish equipment, labor, materials, and supplies for the project, or it may state that the department will furnish the materials and supplies.
If the department elects to provide materials and supplies for a project, it shall make the election at the time it adopts the construction program.
The department shall acquire these materials and supplies under AS 36.30 by requesting bids for them according to the class, type, and nature of the materials and supplies.
The contract may be awarded either upon the basis of delivery to the construction project directly or to a central storehouse or storehouses maintained by the department.
Those materials and supplies so purchased by the department may be delivered to the project site without expense to the contractor, or it may sell them to the contractor at cost and make the materials and supplies a part of the construction cost.

History.

(§ 3 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 35 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For waiver of bidding requirements in an area affected by an economic disaster, see AS

44.33.300

.

Collateral references. —

Revocation, prior to execution of formal written contract, of vote or decision of public body awarding contract to bidder. 3 ALR3d 864.

Public contracts: authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids. 52 ALR4th 186.

Sec. 35.15.030.
Advertisement, bids, contracts, and informal bids. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 35.15.040.
Procedures for the award of contracts.

Award of a contract for the construction of a public work shall comply with this title, AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), and the regulations adopted under those laws.

History.

(§ 5 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 36 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.15.050.
Award of contracts. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 35.15.060.
Prior contracts unaffected. [Repealed, § 56 ch 14 SLA 1987.]